Tennessee, session 114, HB0122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-2018, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) For purposes of this section, the Tennessee Advanced Communications
Network (TACN), is the division of the department of safety that operates, maintains, and
oversees the statewide P25 interoperable communications system.
(b) The department may promulgate rules regarding access to the P25
interoperable communications system, including the authority to collect fees and
assessments for the maintenance, use, and improvement of the P25 interoperable
communications system.
(c) All fees and assessments collected by the department pursuant to the rules
established in subsection (b) are expendable receipts of the department for the
maintenance, use, and improvement of the P25 interoperable communications system.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0122
000176
- 1 -